Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applicant" means a property owner or developer, or the representative or
agent of any property owner or developer, who has filed an application;
(b) "Application" means the filing of an application for a building permit,
development plan, or subdivision plat, provided the application substantially
complies with the requirements of local development ordinances and
regulations;
(c) "Approval" means:
1. The approval by a planning unit of a preliminary development plan;
2. The approval by a planning unit in which a property is located of a
final development plan submitted by an applicant where no
preliminary development is required; or
3. The issuance of a building permit to an applicant where neither a
preliminary development plan nor final development plan is required;
(d) "Development standard":
1. Means any standard adopted by a planning unit or local government
that is applicable to the development of property, including but not
limited to those relating to:
a. Planning and zoning;
b. Storm water;
c. Construction or building, including of streets, alleys, curbs, and
sidewalks;
d. Layout or design; and
Page 1 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
e. Lot size or dimension; and
2. Does not include standards required by federal or state law;
(e) "Final development plan" means a plan which has been submitted by an
applicant and approved by a relevant authority describing with reasonable
certainty the type and intensity of use for a specific parcel or parcels of
property, and may be in any form, including but not limited to a subdivision
plat or development plan;
(f) "Local government" means any city, county, consolidated local
government, urban-county government, charter county government, or
unified local government;
(g) "Planning unit" has the same meaning as in KRS 100.111;
(h) "Preliminary development plan" means a plan which has been submitted by
an applicant and that depicts a single-phased or multiphased planned
development typically used to facilitate initial public feedback and secure
preliminary approvals from a relevant authority;
(i) "Relevant authority" means a local governmental entity enforcing any
development standards and includes a planning unit; and
(j) "Site preparation" means the:
1. Excavating, grading, demolition, removing excess debris to allow for
proper grading, or providing a surface for a proper foundation,
drainage, and settling for a development project; and
2. Physical improvements, including but not limited to water and
sanitary sewer lines, footings, or foundations installed on a site for
which construction permits are required.
(2) (a) On the date of application to a relevant authority, the applicant shall have a
vested property right for any property that is the subject of the application.
The vested property right shall:
Page 2 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
1. Grant the applicant the ability to use the development standards in
effect on the date of application except as set out in subsection (4) of
this section;
2. Be retained by the applicant during the vesting periods established in
paragraph (c) of this subsection; and
3. Only be terminated as set out in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) A relevant authority shall consider an application using the development
standards in effect on the date the application was submitted. A relevant
authority shall not deny an application due to a change in a development
standard that occurs after the submission of the application.
(c) A vested property right under this section shall be subject to the following
time periods:
1. a. When the right is established due to the issuance of a building
permit, it shall begin on the date of application for the building
permit and shall remain in effect for the time period authorized
by the building permit, including any approved renewal obtained
by the applicant prior to the expiration or termination of the
permit to be renewed.
b. The right shall terminate if the applicant fails to pursue site
preparation or construction with reasonable diligence; and
2. a. When the right is established due to the submission of a
preliminary development plan, the vesting period shall be for a
period of three (3) years following the approval.
b. To maintain a vested right, an applicant shall:
i. Obtain approval of a final development plan if one is
required by the relevant authority;
ii. Secure all necessary permits; and
Page 3 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
iii. Pursue site preparation or construction with reasonable
diligence.
c. If the applicant maintains the vested right as set out in division b.
of this subparagraph, the vesting period shall extend for an
additional two (2) years beyond the date of expiration of the
initial three (3) year period, during which time the applicant
shall commence construction of the development.
d. The vesting period shall continue during the construction of the
development and until the relevant authority has certified final
completion of the development, but shall not exceed ten (10)
years from the date of the initial approval.
e. Developments that proceed in two (2) or more sections or phases
as described in a development plan shall have a separate vesting
period for each section or phase, and the development standards
applicable for the first section or phase shall be applicable for
any subsequent section or phase. The vesting period for
developments that proceed in sections or phases shall not exceed
fifteen (15) years following an initial approval, regardless of the
commencement of a particular section or phase of the
development.
(d) A relevant authority may grant an extension for any of the vesting periods
set out in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) A relevant authority shall not require an applicant to waive the applicant's
vested rights as a condition of approval or as consideration for an approval
under this section.
(3) (a) A relevant authority may terminate an applicant's vested rights during the
vesting period set out in subsection (2)(c) of this section by providing notice
Page 4 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
to the applicant that the planning unit has found that:
1. An applicant has materially violated the terms and conditions specified
in the approved development plan or building permit;
2. An applicant has materially violated a local ordinance established by
the relevant authority;
3. The enactment of any state or federal law, administrative regulation,
rule, or other similar device would preclude the development as
approved; or
4. An applicant intentionally supplied inaccurate information or
knowingly made misrepresentations material to the issuance of an
approval.
(b) The termination of a vested right under paragraph (a)1. to 3. of this
subsection shall occur only after the applicant has been given ninety (90)
days from the date of notice to cure any violation or modify any plan.
(c) A relevant authority may, despite reaching a finding as set out in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, allow the property right to remain vested upon a
written determination that doing so would be in the best interest of the
community.
(4) (a) A vested right shall not preclude enforcement of a development standard
contrary to that secured by a vested right when:
1. The relevant authority obtains the written consent of an applicant or
owner;
2. The relevant authority determines that a compelling countervailing
interest exists specifically relating to a prior development standard
secured by a vested right, where use of that prior development
standard would seriously threaten public health, safety, or welfare of
the community and the threat cannot be mitigated by the applicant
Page 5 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
within a reasonable time;
3. The relevant authority determines that a natural or man-made hazard
on the property subject to an approval that was not identified in the
development plan or building permit would pose a serious threat to
public health, safety, or welfare of the community and the threat
cannot be mitigated by the applicant within a reasonable time; or
4. A new development standard is required by the enactment of any state
or federal law, administrative regulation, rule, or any other similar
device.
(b) The findings under paragraph (a)2. and 3. of this subsection shall be made
in writing and provided to the applicant.
(5) A vested property right does not alter, amend, impair, or change the eminent
domain powers of a relevant authority as set out in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky.
(6) (a) This section shall not alter, amend, impair, or change the authority of a
planning unit to exercise its planning and zoning authority, except a vested
property right shall preclude the effect of any planning and zoning action
which would alter, amend, impair, change, diminish, or otherwise delay the
development of the property in accordance with an application.
(b) If a planning unit enacts a moratorium on development or construction, a
vesting period authorized under subsection (2) of this section shall be tolled
during the period of the moratorium.
(7) (a) An applicant seeking to amend an approved development plan shall seek the
approval of the relevant authority. The relevant authority may deny an
amendment if it finds that the amendment:
1. Substantially alters the proposed use;
2. Increases the overall area of the development;
Page 6 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
3. Alters the size of any nonresidential structures included in the
development plan;
4. Increases the density of the development in a way that would have a
substantial impact on traffic, noise, or the environment; or
5. Substantially increases any expense of the relevant authority
necessary to implement the changes sought by the amendment.
(b) If a relevant authority denies an amendment under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the applicant may proceed under the prior approved plan and
retain the vested right or allow the vested right to terminate and apply for a
new approval under this section.
Section 2. KRS 100.347 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person or entity claiming to be injured or aggrieved by any final action of
the board of adjustment who meets the criteria in subsection (6) of this
section,[ and that owns real property within the same zone where the property
that is the subject of the final action is located] shall appeal from the action to
the Circuit Court of the county in which the property that is the subject of the
action of the board of adjustment lies.
(b) The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the final action of the
board.
(c) All final actions which have not been appealed within thirty (30) days shall
not be subject to judicial review.
(d) The board of adjustment shall be a party in any appeal filed in the Circuit
Court under this subsection.
(2) (a) Any person or entity claiming to be injured or aggrieved by any final action of
the planning commission who meets the criteria in subsection (6) of this
section,[ and that owns real property within the same zone where the property
that is the subject of the final action is located] shall appeal from the final
Page 7 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
action to the Circuit Court of the county in which the property that is the
subject of the commission's action lies.
(b) The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the action of the
commission. Such action shall not include the commission's recommendations
made to other governmental bodies.
(c) All final actions which have not been appealed within thirty (30) days shall
not be subject to judicial review. Provided, however, any appeal of a planning
commission action granting or denying a variance or conditional use permit
authorized by KRS 100.203(5) shall be taken pursuant to this subsection. In
such case, the thirty (30) day period for taking an appeal begins to run at the
time the legislative body grants or denies the map amendment for the same
development.
(d) The planning commission shall be a party in any appeal filed in the Circuit
Court under this subsection.
(3) (a) Any person or entity claiming to be injured or aggrieved by any final action of
the legislative body of any city, county, consolidated local government, or
urban-county government, relating to a map amendment who meets the
criteria in subsection (6) of this section,[ and that owns real property within
the same zone where the property that is the subject of the final action is
located] shall appeal from the action to the Circuit Court of the county in
which the property that is the subject of the map amendment lies.
(b) The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the final action of the
legislative body.
(c) All final actions which have not been appealed within thirty (30) days shall
not be subject to judicial review.
(d) The legislative body shall be a party in any appeal filed in the Circuit Court
under this subsection.
Page 8 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 224/GA
(4) The owner of the subject property and applicants who initiated the proceeding shall
be made parties to the appeal. Other persons speaking at the public hearing are not
required to be made parties to such appeal.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, final action shall be deemed to have occurred on the
calendar date when the vote is taken to approve or disapprove the matter pending
before the body.
(6) Only the following persons or entities shall have standing to challenge a final
action under this section:
(a) An applicant who initiated the proceeding that is subject to the final action;
(b) An owner of the property that is the subject of the final action; or
(c) A third party who:
1. Owns real property within the same zone where the property that is the
subject of the final action is located;
2. Would sustain actual damages that are personal to the third party and
distinct from damages that would impact the public generally; and
3. Participated in the approval process prior to the final action by:
a. Submitting a written statement to the relevant body; or
b. Speaking at a public hearing of the relevant body.
Other persons or entities shall not have standing to challenge a final action under
this section.
Page 9 of 9
SB022410.100 - 2202 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:54 AM GA